Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2404
Interpreters; qualifications.

No person shall be appointed as an interpreter pursuant to sections 25-2401 to 25-2407 unless such person is readily able to communicate with the person unable to communicate the English language, translate the proceedings for him or her, and accurately repeat and translate the statements of such person to the jury, judge, and officials before whom such proceeding takes place.

Laws 1973, LB 116, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 10.